Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 2 Court Ordered Services

37-4-40.
[Reserved] Filing petition with court for according of program of services to developmentally disabled person; order for examination of person by comprehensive evaluation team; report by team; petition hearing; procedure upon finding that department services are necessary.

History.
Ga. L. 1919, p. 377, § 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 41; Code 1933, § 35-304; Code 1933, §§ 88-2506, 88-2507, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2504, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734,
§ 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1985, p. 926, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2531, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-5, 3-14/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2011.

37-4-40.1 through 37-4-40.5.
[Repealed]

History.
Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 5/HB 324, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections were based on Code 1981, §

37-4-40.1

through 37-4-40.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1092, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 14; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-5/HB 228, 3-6/HB 228.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 37/HB 90, effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the reservation of these Code sections.

37-4-41.
[Reserved] Procedure upon failure of or client’s noncompliance with court ordered habilitation program.

History.
Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2011.

37-4-42.
Procedure for continuation of court ordered habilitation.

If it is necessary to continue habilitation of a client beyond the end of the period during which the facility is currently authorized by order of a court or of an administrative law judge to retain the client, the superintendent or regional state hospital
administrator, prior to the expiration of the period, shall seek an order authorizing such continued habilitation in the manner provided in this Code section.

A Committee for Continued Habilitation Review shall be established by the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of each facility and shall consist of not less than five persons who meet the same requirements as those persons eligible
to be members of the comprehensive habilitation team as defined in Code Section 37-4-2. The committee may conduct its meetings with a quorum of any three members. The function of this committee shall be to review and evaluate the
updated individualized program plan and to report to the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator its recommendations concerning the client’s need for continued habilitation. No person who has responsibility for
the habilitation of the individual client for whom continued habilitation is requested shall serve on any committee which reviews such individual’s case.

If the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator desires to seek an order under this Code section authorizing continued habilitation for up to 12 months beyond the expiration of the currently authorized period of habilitation, he or she
shall first file a notice of such intended action with the Committee for Continued Habilitation Review, which shall be forwarded to the committee at least 60 days prior to the expiration of that period.

Within ten days of the date of the notice, the committee shall meet to consider the matter of the superintendent’s or regional state hospital administrator’s intention to seek an order for continued habilitation. Prior to the committee’s meeting, the
client and his or her representatives shall be notified of the following: the purpose of such meeting, the time and place of such meeting, their right to be present at such meeting, and their right to present any alternative individualized
program plan secured at their expense. In those cases in which the client will not or cannot appear, at least one member of the committee will make all reasonable efforts to interview the client and report to the committee. An
updated individualized program plan for the client shall be presented to the committee. The committee shall report to the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator or his or her designee, other than the attending
physician or a member of the committee, its written recommendations along with any minority recommendations which may also be submitted. Such report shall specify whether or not the client is a developmentally disabled person requiring
continued habilitation and whether continued habilitation is the least restrictive alternative available.

If after considering the committee’s recommendations and minority recommendations, if any, the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator or his or her designee, other than the attending physician or a member of the committee, determines
that the client is not a developmentally disabled person requiring continued habilitation, the client shall be discharged from the facility pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-4-44.

If after considering the committee’s recommendations and minority recommendations, if any, the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator or his or her designee, other than the client’s attending physician or a member of the committee, determines
that the client is a developmentally disabled person requiring continued habilitation, he or she shall, within ten days after receiving the committee’s recommendations, serve a petition for an order authorizing continued habilitation
along with copies of the updated individualized program plan and the committee’s report on the designated office within the department and shall also serve such petition along with a copy of the updated individualized program plan
on the client. The petition shall contain a plain and simple statement that the client or his or her representatives may file a request for a hearing with the Office of State Administrative Hearings within 15 days after service
of the petition, that the client has a right to counsel at the hearing, that the client or his or her representatives may apply immediately to the administrative law judge to have counsel appointed if the client cannot afford counsel,
and that the administrative law judge will appoint counsel for the client unless the client indicates in writing that he or she will have retained counsel by the time set for hearing or does not desire to be represented by counsel.

If a hearing is not requested by the client or the representatives within 15 days after service of the petition on the client and his or her representatives, the administrative law judge shall make an independent review of the committee’s report, the
updated individualized program plan, and the petition. If he or she concludes that continued habilitation may not be necessary or if he or she finds any member of the committee so concluded, then he or she shall order that a hearing
be held pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section. If he or she concludes that continued habilitation is necessary, then he or she shall order continued habilitation for a period not to exceed one year.

If a hearing is requested within 15 days after service of the petition on the client and his or her representatives or if the administrative law judge orders a hearing pursuant to subsection (g) of this Code section, the administrative law judge shall
set a time and place for the hearing to be held within 25 days of the time the administrative law judge receives the request, but, in any event, no later than the day on which the current order for habilitation expires. Notice
of the hearing shall be served on the client, his or her representatives, the facility, and, when appropriate, on counsel for the client. The administrative law judge, within his or her discretion, may grant a change of venue for
the convenience of parties or witnesses. Such hearing shall be a full and fair hearing, except that the client’s attorney, when the client is unable to attend the hearing and is incapable of consenting to a waiver of his or her
appearance, may move that the client not be required to appear; however, the record shall reflect the reasons for the administrative law judge’s actions.

After such hearing, the administrative law judge may order the client’s continued habilitation for a period not to exceed one year, subject to the power of the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator to discharge the client under subsection
(b) of Code Section 37-4-44; provided, however, that if the administrative law judge finds that the client is not developmentally disabled or is not in need of care, training, education, habilitation, or other specialized services
which the client is then receiving, the administrative law judge shall dismiss the petition.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2507, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 926, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 6/HB 324.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Involuntary Commitment of People with Mental Retardation: Ensuring All of Georgia’s Citizens Receive Adequate Procedural Due Process,” see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 711 (2007).

For article, “Disability Constitutional Law,” see 63 Emory L. J. 527 (2014).

For article, “Disability Constitutional Law,” see 63 Emory L. J. 527 (2014).

37-4-43.
[Reserved] Appointment of hearing examiners for hearings as to continued habilitation; powers of hearing examiners generally; issuance of subpoenas; appointment of counsel.

History.
Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 6; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 4/HB 324 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2011.

37-4-44.
Periodic review of individualized program plan; discharge or transfer to another facility upon change in client’s needs; notice of discharge or transfer.

Each individualized program plan shall be reviewed at regular intervals to determine the client’s progress toward the stated goals and objectives of the plan and to determine whether the plan should be modified because of the client’s present level of
performance. These reviews should be based upon relevant progress notes in the client’s clinical record and upon other related information, and a reasonable effort shall be made to obtain and utilize input from the client and his
representatives.

Any time a client is found by the person in charge of the client’s habilitation no longer to be in need of services from the department, the client shall be discharged.

At least 14 days before discharge of the client or transfer of the client pursuant to a modification of his program plan, notice of such action shall be given to the client, his representatives, and, if the client’s program plan was ordered by a court,
to the court which entered such order.

History.
Ga. L. 1919, p. 377, § 6; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 41; Code 1933, § 35-306; Code 1933, § 88-2509, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2508, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.